Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 7. Local Governmental Power Development Under Laws of 1934.

§ 77-5-301.
Counties may engage in power development.

The counties of the State of Mississippi, acting by and through their boards of supervisors, are hereby authorized to erect, construct, purchase, and/or acquire and/or maintain and/or operate electric light plants, electric transmission lines, electric distribution system substations, and/or all electrical appurtenances and/or electric appliances and/or electric equipment necessary or useful in the operation or distribution of electric power and/or electric energy. The boards of supervisors shall have full authority to purchase, rent, lease, and/or acquire any and/or all kinds of property, real and/or personal, in order to carry out said powers and to enter into any and all contracts with the Tennessee Valley Authority and/or any similar agency of the federal government, which may be deemed necessary or expedient by such boards in exercising such powers. The boards of supervisors shall have full control over the erection, construction, maintenance, and operation of such properties, with full powers to pass rules for the control, operation, and maintenance of such properties, the rate to be charged, the manner of operation, and the employment of officials and employees of every kind.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5429; Laws, 1934, ch. 291.

§ 77-5-303.
Intergovernmental cooperation.

The board of supervisors of any county is expressly authorized to combine with any other county and/or municipality and/or counties and/or municipalities in the purchase and/or construction and/or the leasing and/or the acquiring of any of the properties enumerated in the preceding section of this article. For this purpose the boards of supervisors of the counties, and/or the governing authorities of the municipalities, are authorized and empowered to arrange by contract all the details for the erection, construction, maintenance, operation, and control of such property, the sharing of the costs, and/or the distribution of power, and the selection of a governing body to control and handle said property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5430; Laws, 1934, ch. 291.

§ 77-5-305.
Ordinance of intention; notice; election.

In the event the board of supervisors of any county shall decide to exercise the powers authorized by this article, it shall adopt an ordinance expressing such intention and outlining the nature of the project and/or projects to be undertaken, and fix the maximum sum to be expended on said project for the erection, construction, improvement, and/or purchase of any of the property authorized to be acquired by this article. The board shall give notice of such intention by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in or published in said county for at least once a week for three successive weeks. It shall only be necessary that said notice shall state that the board has declared its intention to avail itself of the powers granted by this article, and to name the maximum amount proposed to be invested in the projects proposed.

In the event that twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the county do not file a written protest against any such project by or before the first regular meeting of the board of supervisors after completion of publication of notice, the board is authorized to exercise the powers and authority named in Section 77-5-301 without further notice.

In the event that twenty percent (20%) of the qualified voters shall file such written petition protesting against such proposed projects, the board must call a special election, before proceeding further, giving notice of the date of such election by publication in a newspaper published in the county or having a general circulation in said county, at least once each week for three successive weeks, the first publication of which must be at least thirty (30) days before the date of the election. The board of supervisors shall have the power to fix the date of such election, and such election shall be conducted as other special elections are conducted. If a majority of the qualified electors voting in such election shall vote in favor of such project, the board of supervisors shall have the power to put the same into effect. The board of supervisors may, in its discretion, call a special election without a petition of protest being filed, which shall be conducted in the same manner as heretofore outlined.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5431; Laws, 1934, ch. 291.

§ 77-5-307.
Activities must be self-sustaining.

No board of supervisors taking advantage of the provisions of this article shall issue any notes, bonds, or other obligations against the county for the purpose of paying or securing the payment of the cost or expense of purchasing, constructing, or otherwise acquiring, extending, or improving any real or personal property to be used, operated, or controlled under the provisions of this article, and the credit of the county shall not be pledged for the obligations arising out of the exercise of the powers contained in this article. All revenue derived from the operation of any property authorized by this article shall be placed in a separate fund, out of which the expenses are authorized to be paid. The board of supervisors shall have the power to pledge, assign, or otherwise hypothecate the net earnings of said property for a period not exceeding twenty-five years for the purpose of securing the payment of the original cost of the purchase and/or construction and/or extension and/or improvement of such property and also to mortgage or otherwise give a lien on any such property in order to secure the payment of any indebtedness on such property. The board of supervisors shall have power to borrow money for the purpose of paying the expenses authorized by this section and to issue negotiable notes or other evidences of indebtedness each of which shall distinctly state on its face that it is payable solely out of the earnings of the electric power system of such county and that the full faith and credit of the county are not pledged for its payment. The board of supervisors shall have the power to mortgage or otherwise give a lien on the electric power system of the county in order to secure any money borrowed for the purposes authorized in this article. The board of supervisors is expressly authorized to enter into such contracts as may be necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5432; Laws, 1934, ch. 291.

§ 77-5-309.
Exercise of power of eminent domain.

The board of supervisors of any county is expressly authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain anywhere in the state, within or without the boundaries of such county, in order to acquire any property, real or personal, necessary or useful in the furtherance of the provisions of this article. Any property so acquired shall be paid for only out of the earnings of the electric power system of such county, or from money borrowed as authorized under the provisions of Section 77-5-307.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5433; Laws, 1934, ch. 291.

§ 77-5-311.
Debt limitations are inapplicable.

No statutes fixing the maximum amount of indebtedness of the county or prohibiting the issuance of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness shall apply or operate to limit the amount of money to be borrowed under this article, and in computing the indebtedness of any county the money borrowed under the provisions of this article, and the credit obtained under the provisions of this article, shall not be included as an obligation or indebtedness of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5434; Laws, 1934, ch. 291.

§ 77-5-313.
Provisions of this article shall be applicable to municipalities as well as counties.

All rights, privileges, powers and duties granted or imposed in the preceding sections to counties acting through their boards of supervisors shall likewise apply and be applicable to the municipalities acting through their governing authorities, who may exercise the same conjunctively with counties acting through their boards of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5435; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-315.
Construction of article; article cumulative.

It being the purpose of this article to promote rural electrification and encourage the Tennessee Valley Authority to distribute electric power in this state, the provisions of this article shall receive a liberal interpretation and construction.

It is not the purpose of this article to repeal or alter any existing law providing for the purchase, construction, and/or operation of any electric light plant, transmission lines, distribution system, and/or other electric properties by municipalities and/or counties, but to provide an additional and/or cumulative and/or alternative method for the acquiring, purchasing, constructing, maintaining, operating, and/or controlling of such electric light plants, transmission lines, distribution systems, and/or other electric properties coming under the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 5436, 5437; Laws, 1934, ch. 291.